Washington statutes.
RCW 15.86.070

Rules—Certification program—Fees.

(1) The director may adopt rules establishing a program for certifying producers, processors, and handlers as meeting state, national, or international standards for organic or transitional products.

(2) The rules:

(a) May govern, but are not limited to governing:

(i) The number and scheduling of on-site visits, both announced and unannounced, by certification personnel;

(ii) Recordkeeping requirements; and

(iii) The submission of product samples for chemical analysis; and

(b) Shall include a fee schedule that will provide for the recovery of the full cost of the program.

(3) All fees collected under this chapter shall be deposited in an account within the agricultural local fund. The revenue from such fees shall be used solely for carrying out the provisions of this chapter, and no appropriation is required for disbursement from the fund.

(4) The director may employ such personnel as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2010 c 109 s 6; 2002 c 220 s 5; 1997 c 303 s 4; 1992 c 71 s 10; 1989 c 354 s 34; 1987 c 393 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—1997 c 303: See note following RCW 43.135.055.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.